District of Columbia statutes.
4-531

Repealed

Definitions.

Repealed.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-100, § 2, 29 DCR 969
Sept. 26, 1990, D.C. Law 8-164, § 2, 37 DCR 4824
May 16, 1995, D.C. Law 10-255, § 8, 41 DCR 5193
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-243, § 20, 44 DCR 1142
1981 Ed., § 3-401.
For temporary repeal of §§ 4-531 through 4-545, see § 20 of the Victims of Violent Crime Compensation Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-447, December 5, 1996, 43 DCR 6669), and § 20 of the Victims of Violent Crime Compensation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-34, March 11, 1997, 44 DCR 1915).